Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1071.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5304. Criminal concealment by law enforcement officer.(a) Offense defined.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a law enforcement officer is guilty of criminal concealment if the law enforcement officer:(1) Wears a mask, facial covering, disguise or any other garment that obscures the identity of the law enforcement officer while performing official duties and interacting with the public.(2) Intentionally obscures, covers, removes or otherwise 12345678910111213141516171819 conceals a badge, tag, label or other identifying information required to be visibly displayed while performing official duties and interacting with the public.(b) Exceptions.--(1) A law enforcement officer shall not be in violation of subsection (a)(1) if the officer:(i) Wears a medical-grade mask or respirator to prevent the transmission of airborne illnesses.(ii) Wears protective equipment designed to safeguard the face or head issued as part of duties associated with a Special Weapons and Tactics team.(iii) Wears an item as a mask designed to protect against smoke or hazardous conditions during fire response or similar emergencies.(2) A law enforcement officer shall not be in violation of subsection (a)(1) or (2) if the law enforcement officer is engaged in an undercover assignment, approved by a supervisor, in which concealing identity is necessary for investigating criminal offenses.(c) Grading.-- A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor of the second degree.(d) Sentencing.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, pursuant to 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement applicable to an offense under this section when the conduct results in injury to a civilian or in the improper seizure or detention of a civilian without the requisite reasonable suspicion or probable cause. The enhancement shall reflect the gravity of the harm caused and the heightened culpability associated with an abuse of authority.20250SB1071PN1264 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "law enforcement officer" includes Federal law enforcement officials and a "peace officer" as defined in section 501 (relating to definitions).Section 2. Title 53 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2173. Visible badge requirement.(a) Display.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a law enforcement officer in a county, city or other municipality while performing official duties and interacting with the public must:(1) Visibly display a badge, tag or label clearly identifying the law enforcement officer and the law enforcement agency to which the officer belongs at all times.(2) Produce a badge, tag or label upon request.(b) Exception.--The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to a law enforcement officer engaged in an undercover assignment, approved by a supervisor, in which concealing identity is necessary for investigating criminal offenses.(c) Cause of action.--Any aggrieved person shall have the right to bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction in this Commonwealth against any law enforcement officer under this section on the grounds that the law enforcement officer intentionally violated the provisions of this section.(d) Remedies.--A court of competent jurisdiction may order the following remedies:(1) An order requiring the county, city or other municipality, department or agency to cease and desist the unlawful practice.(2) Payment of compensatory damages, provided that an aggrieved person shall make a reasonable effort to mitigate 20250SB1071PN1264 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any damages.(3) Payment of reasonable attorney fees.(4) Payment of court costs.(5) Other equitable relief, including, but not limited to, the dismissal or removal from office of the law enforcement officer.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "law enforcement officer" includes Federal law enforcement officials and a "peace officer" as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1071PN1264 - 4 - 1234567891011